District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1217.25

Condemnation for streets through unsubdivided part of plot — Authorized.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 721, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-215, 7-216.